Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF74.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462.357, subdivision 1c, is amended to read: Subd. 1c. Amortization prohibited. new text begin (a) new text end Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a municipality must not enact, amend, or enforce an ordinance providing for the elimination or termination of a use by amortization which use was lawful at the time of its inception. new text begin (b)new text end This subdivision does not apply tonew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end adults-only bookstores, adults-only theaters, or similar adults-only businesses, as defined by ordinancedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) in a city of the first class, a nonconforming industrial use in an environmental justice area as defined by section 116.065, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end